src/orthography/uppercase-word.twolc
! The orthographical conventions of uppercasing sentence-initial words
! can be compiled into the transducer using relatively simple ruleset.
! The other non-standard but still common convention is to write emphasis
! by uppercasing all characters of the word. While this convention has mostly
! disappeared with modern word processors and more advanced ways of emphasis,
! there are texts that may benefit recognising words written in all caps.

Alphabet
! Alphabetic characters of Finnish standard set
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s š t u v w x y z ž å ä ö
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö
! The uppercasing of Finnish alphabets
a:A b:B c:C d:D e:E f:F g:G h:H i:I j:J k:K l:L m:M n:N o:O p:P
q:Q r:R s:S š:Š t:T u:U v:V w:W x:X y:Y z:Z ž:Ž å:Å ä:Ä ö:Ö
! We enumerate also all alphabetic characters that standards have described
! to appear in extended set of Finnish characters, i.e. CLDR and MES standards
á à â ã ā ă ą ç ć ĉ ċ č đ ð ď é è ê ë ē ĕ ę ė ě ƒ ĝ ğ ġ ģ ȟ ħ í ì î ï ĩ ī ĭ 
į ı ĳ ĵ ķ ĸ ĺ ļ ľ ŀ ł ñ ń ņ ň ŉ ŋ ó ò ô ō ŏ ŕ ŗ ř ś ŝ ş ſ ţ ť ŧ ß þ ú ù û ü
ũ ū ŭ ů ų ŵ ý ŷ ÿ ű ź ż ʒ æ ø œ ő ə
Á À Â Ã Ā Ă Ą Ç Ć Ĉ Ċ Č Ð Ď É È Ê Ë Ē Ĕ Ę Ė Ě Ĝ Ğ Ġ Ģ Ȟ Ħ Í Ì Î Ï Ĩ Ī Ĭ Į İ
Ĳ Ĵ Ķ Ĺ Ļ Ľ Ŀ Ł Ñ Ń Ņ Ň Ŋ Ó Ò Ô Ō Ŏ Ŕ Ŗ Ř Ś Ŝ Ş Ţ Ť Ŧ Þ Ú Ù Û Ü Ũ Ū Ŭ Ů Ų Ŵ
Ý Ŷ Ű Ź Ż Ʒ Æ Ø Œ Ő Ə
! The uppercasing of the extended Finnish alphabet. The following complex and
! rare uppercasings are not implemented yet:
! FIXME: missing slasheds
! FIXME: I seriously cannot uppercase turkish I here
! FIXME: and won't bother for ß either
á:Á à:À â:Â ã:Ã ā:Ā ă:Ǎ ą:Ą ç:Ç ć:Ć ĉ:Ĉ ċ:Ċ č:Č ð:Ð ď:Ď
é:É è:È ê:Ê ë:Ë ē:Ē ĕ:Ě ę:Ę ė:Ė ě:Ě ĝ:Ĝ ğ:Ǧ ġ:Ġ ģ:Ǵ ȟ:Ḣ
í:Í ì:Ì î:Î ï:Ï ĩ:Ĩ ī:Ī ĭ:Ĭ ĵ:Ĵ ķ:Ķ ĺ:Ĺ ļ:Ļ ľ:Ľ ŀ:Ŀ
ñ:Ñ ń:Ǹ ņ:Ņ ň:Ň ŉ:Ṅ ó:Ó ò:Ò ô:Ô ō:Ō ŏ:Ŏ ŕ:Ŕ ŗ:Ŗ ř:Ř ś:Ś ŝ:Ŝ ş:Ş
ţ:Ţ ť:Ť þ:Þ ú:Ú ù:Ù û:Û ü:Ü

! compounding hyphen needs to be taken care of since compound words allow for
! uppercase characters to appear in middle of the word.
%-

%{#%} %{##%}

! Uppercasing analyses; for some applications the uppercasing cannot be
! read from the word data so we add an analysis tag for the different
! uppercasing processes
0:%[CASECHANGE%=UPFIRST%] 0:%[CASECHANGE%=UPALL%]
0:%[CASECHANGE%=NONE%]
;

Sets
Lower = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s š t u v w x y z ž å ä ö
        á à â ã ā ă ç ć ĉ ċ č ð ď é è ê ë ē ė ĕ ĝ ġ í ì ï î ĩ ī ǐ
        ķ ĺ ļ ľ ŀ ñ ń ņ ň ó ò ô ō ŏ ŕ ŗ ř ś ŝ ş ţ ť þ ú ù û ü         ;
Upper = A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö
        Á À Â Ã Ā Ǎ Ç Ć Ĉ Ċ Č Ð Ď É È Ê Ë Ē Ė Ě Ĝ Ġ Í Ì Ï Î Ĩ Ī Ǐ 
        Ķ Ĺ Ļ Ľ Ŀ Ñ Ń Ņ Ň Ó Ò Ô Ō Ǒ Ŕ Ŗ Ř Ś Ŝ Ş Ţ Ť Þ Ú Ù Û Ü         ;
CaseChange = %[CASECHANGE%=NONE%] %[CASECHANGE%=UPALL%] %[CASECHANGE%=UPFIRST%] ;
WordBoundary = %{##%} %{#%} %-;

Rules
"Require uppercase at beginning and after upper-cases"
! The whole standard uppercasing rule is two-fold; if uppercasing exists, it
! must be next to word boundary, or another uppercased character. This rule
! discards word-medial uppercasing and only allows runs of lower-to-uppercase
! characters starting from left boundaries.
Lc:Uc => WordBoundary _ ; 
         Lower:Upper _ ; where Lc in Lower Uc in Upper matched ;

"Disallow retained lowercase after word medial uppercase"
! If at least two initial characters of word or word part have been uppercased
! by the rule, it is not possible to have lowercase characters following. This
! is to say that any uppercasing run in word is either one character long
! (as with titlecasing) or covers all characters of the word part (writing
! in all caps).
Lc /<= Lower:Upper Lower:Upper [Lower:Upper | ? ]* _ ; where Lc in Lower ;

"Mark no case changes"
! When none of the characters of the words have been uppercased, we introduce
! the analysis of no case changes.
0:%[CASECHANGE%=NONE%] <=> %{##%}: [Lower | Upper] [? - [Lower:Upper | %{##%}:]]* %{##%}: _ # ;

"Mark uppercasing all"
! If all of the lowercase characters in word have been uppercased, we introduce
! analysis for uppercasing.
0:%[CASECHANGE%=UPALL%] <=> %{##%}: Lower:Upper [? -  [:Lower | %{##%}:]]* %{##%}: _ # ;

"Mark uppercasing first"
! if initial characters of the word were uppercased, we introduce analysis of
! titlecasing
0:%[CASECHANGE%=UPFIRST%] <=> %{##%}: Lower:Upper :Lower [? - [Lower:Upper | %{##%}: ]]* %{##%}: _ # ;
